src/fst/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! First comes the continuation lexicon, in order to see it easier

LEXICON adv
+Adv: FINAL1 ;

LEXICON adv-comp
+Adv+Gram/Comp: FINAL1 ;
LEXICON adv-sup
+Adv+Gram/Superl: FINAL1 ;

LEXICON adv-interr-rel
+Adv+Subqst: FINAL1 ;         ! NOTLEMMA
+Adv: FINAL1 ; ! We go for the sme way of doing things.

LEXICON laakanlex
              :#  laakanword ;
     +Err/Orth:-  laakanword ;
 +MWE+Err/Orth:%  laakanword ;

LEXICON laakanword
 :laakan adv ;

LEXICON ligkelex
!LEXICON Cmp-Adv
! Then comes the Adverb lexicon itself. There are many (sub)regular adverbial
! case patterns here, they are not encoded in the present system.
!:s Adv-Cmp ;
:#ligke adv ;
+Err/Orth:-ligke adv ;

LEXICON Adverb
aski-aski adv ; 
aadtjen:aadtjen adv ;
aajmoelaakan:aajmoe laakanlex ;
aarjeleslaakan:aarjeles laakanlex ;
aatsolen:aatsolen adv ;
aehtjielaakan:aehtjie laakanlex ;
aelhkieslaakan:aelhkies laakanlex ;
aktesne:aktesne adv ; 
almetjenligke:almetjen ligkelex ;
alvoeslaakan:alvoes laakanlex ;
avtebe:avtebe adv-comp ; 
avtelbodti+Err/Orth:avtel-bodti adv ;
barhtsan adv ;
bijjie-bijjiebasse:bijjie-bijjiebasse adv-comp ;
bijjiebasse+Err/Orth:bijjiebaase adv-comp ;
bijjiebasse:bijjiebasse adv-comp ;
bijjiegåbpoe:bijjiegåbpoe adv-comp ;
botnjeldahkesne adv ;
buerebe:buerebe adv-comp ;
buerebelaakan:buerebe#laakan adv-comp ; 
buerebelaakan+Err/Orth:buerebe-laakan adv-comp ;
buerebelaakan+MWE+Err/Orth:buerebe% laakan adv-comp ;
buerie-buerebe:buerie-buerebe adv-comp ; !
nåake-nåakebe:nåake-nåakebe adv-comp ; 
buerielaakan:buerie laakanlex ;
båajhtahligke:båajhtah ligkelex ;
båalmaldahkesne adv ;
båastahligke:båastah ligkelex ;
båastoehlaakan:båastoeh laakanlex ;
bæjjesvåårte:bæjjes#våårte adv ;
bööremeslaakan:bööremes#laakan adv-sup ;
bööremeslaakan+Err/Orth:bööremes-laakan adv-sup ;
bööremeslaakan+MWE+Err/Orth:bööremes% laakan adv-sup ;
daamhtah:daamhtah adv ; !XXX from dict, check! ? MLK: This is ok!
daamhtajommes adv-sup ;
daamhtajåbpoe adv-comp ;
daamhtajabpa adv-comp ;
daamtajommes:daamtajommes adv-sup ;
daamtajåbpoe:daamtajåbpoe adv-comp ;
daebpebe:daebpebe adv-comp ; ! 
daebpemes:daebpemes adv-sup ; 
daebpiebasse:daebpiebasse adv-comp ;
daebpiegommes:daebpiegommes adv-sup ;
daebpiegåbpoe:daebpiegåbpoe adv-comp ;
daelvege:daelvege adv ;
dallegh:dallegh adv ;
debpebe:debpebe adv-comp ; 
debpemes:debpemes adv-sup ; 
debpiebasse:debpiebasse adv-comp ;
debpiegammes:debpiegammes adv-sup ;
debpiegommes:debpiegommes adv-sup ;
debpiegåbpoe:debpiegåbpoe adv-comp ;
dejpeli:dejpeli adv ;
dogkoe:dogkoe adv ;
dubpemes:dubpemes adv-sup ;
dubpiebasse:dubpiebasse adv-comp ;
dubpiegammes:dubpiegammes adv-sup ;
dubpiegommes:dubpiegommes adv-sup ;
dubpielommes:dubpielommes adv-sup ;
dubpielåbpoe:dubpielåbpoe adv-comp ;
duebpede:duebpede adv ;
duebpemes:duebpemes adv-sup ; !
duebpiebasse:duebpiebasse adv-comp ;
duebpiegammes:duebpiegammes adv-sup ;
duebpiegommes:duebpiegommes adv-sup ;
duebpielommes:duebpielommes adv-sup ;
duebpielåbpoe:duebpielåbpoe adv-comp ;
dujmieslaakan:dujmies laakanlex ;
dujmiesligke:dujmies ligkelex ;
duvviegommes adv-sup ;
dåajmijeslaakan:dåajmijes laakanlex ;
dæjman:dæjman adv ;
eadtjohkelaakan:eadtjohke laakanlex ;
eensigommes:eensigommes adv-sup ;
eensigåbpoe:eensigåbpoe adv-comp ;
eensilaakan:eensi laakanlex ;
eeptseeremes:eepts#eeremes adv-sup ; ! "gosse vaanesovveme, dellie hov eepts-eeremes dejtie beapmojde sæjhta"
eeremes:eeremes adv-sup ;
ektelen:ektelen adv ;
feerti adv ;
fraksoehlaakan:fraksoeh laakanlex ;
gaajehlaakan:gaajeh laakanlex ;
gaavnjoerokte adv ;
gaedtiegabpa adv-comp ; 
gaedtiegommes adv-comp ;
garrebhlaakan:garrebh laakanlex ;
geehpesligke:geehpes ligkelex ;
geekteleejne+v2:geekte-leejne adv ;
geervelaakan:geerve laakanlex ;
geerveligke:geerve ligkelex ;
gellielaakan:gellie laakanlex ;
gietskiebasse:gietskiebasse adv-comp ;
goekedahken adv ;
gogkoe:gogkoe adv-interr-rel ; ! váccán dagkoe, gogkoe don vázzet
gomtehkeligke:gomtehke ligkelex ;
goske:goske adv-interr-rel ; ! mon boadán, gosse don boadát
gosse+Err/Orth:goss adv-interr-rel ;
gosse+Err/Orth:gusse adv-interr-rel ;
gosse:gosse adv-interr-rel ; ! mon boadán, gosse don boadát
gubpede:gubpede adv-interr-rel ;
gubpene:gubpene adv-interr-rel ;
guektielisnie:guektielisnie adv ;
gukt:gukt adv-interr-rel ;
guktie:guktie adv-interr-rel ; !slik som/at
guktemes:guktemes adv-interr-rel ;
gusn:gusn adv-interr-rel ;
gusnie:gusnie adv-interr-rel ;
gusnie+Err/Orth:gusne adv-interr-rel ;
gustie:gustie adv-interr-rel ;
gåabpah:gåabpah adv-interr-rel ;
gåabpalistie:gåabpalistie adv ;
gåabph:gåabph adv-interr-rel ; !! <== why no case?
gåabpoeh:gåabpoeh adv-interr-rel ;
gåaph:gåaph adv-interr-rel ;
gåarhmahligke:gåarhmah ligkelex ;
gåarhmoehlaakan:gåarhmoeh laakanlex ;
gåetede:gåetede adv ;
gïemhpeslaakan:gïemhpes laakanlex ;
gïemhpesligke:gïemhpes ligkelex ;
gïetskesmieresne:gïetskes#mieresne adv ;
habjoehlaakan:habjoeh laakanlex ;
hamhpoehlaakan:hamhpoeh laakanlex ;
hampasligke:hampas ligkelex ;
heerven:heerven adv ;
heevenlaakan:heeven laakanlex ;
hijvenligke:hijven ligkelex ;
hïervenlaakan:hïerven laakanlex ;
ijtjeligke:ijtje ligkelex ;
inhtselaakan:inhtse laakanlex ;
jarki adv ;
jeatjahlaakan:jeatjah laakanlex ;
jeatjahligke:jeatjah ligkelex ;
jeenemes:jeenemes adv-sup ;
jeenjemes adv-sup ;
jienebh adv-comp ; ! mt = sme eanet
jilliegåbpoe:jilliegåbpoe adv-comp ;
jissehtsligke:jissehts ligkelex ;
joekehthlaakan:joekehth laakanlex ;
jååvkelde adv ;
klåadtoehlaakan:klåadtoeh laakanlex ;
krakngede  adv ;
kråavhtjahligke:kråavhtjah ligkelex ;
laakan: laakanword ; ! need to able second word in compounds
loemehtahkese adv ;
luvliegåbpoe:luvliegåbpoe adv-comp ;
lyjhkedelaakan:lyjhkede laakanlex ;
lyövlesligke:lyövles ligkelex ;
lïhkebe:lïhkebe adv-comp ;
lïhkemes:lïhkemes adv-sup ;
madtanlaakan:madtan laakanlex ;
mannemes adv-sup ;
miehtjielisnie:miehtjielisnie adv ;
minngebe:minngebe adv-comp ;  !XXX from dict, check!
minngemes:minngemes adv-sup ; 
muerhkieslaakan:muerhkies laakanlex ;
mådtanligke:mådtan ligkelex ;
mïektjeldahkesne:mïektjeldahkesne adv ;
naemhtemes:naemhtemes adv-sup ;  !XXX from dict, check!
negativjelaakan:negativje laakanlex ;
nimhtemes adv-sup ;
nimhtems adv-sup ;
njaelkiesligke:njaelkies ligkelex ;
noerhtebasse:noerhtebasse adv-comp ; ! lenger mot nord
nov:nov adv ;
nuemhtemes adv-sup ;
numhtemes adv-sup ;
numhtems adv-sup ;
olkemes adv-sup ;
ovsïemes+Err/Orth:ov-sïemes adv ;
politihkelaakan:politihke laakanlex ;
radtsoehlaakan:radtsoeh laakanlex ;
råarhvan adv ;
rïekteslaakan+Err/Orth:riekts laakanlex ;
saarvehkelaakan:saarvehke laakanlex ; !XXX from dict, check!
seadtoesåbpoe:seadtoesåbpoe adv-comp ;
seammaligke:seamma ligkelex ;
sjeavodslaakan:sjeavods laakanlex ;
sjisjnjiemisnie  adv ;  ! innerst : skåapen sjisjnjiemisnie = innerst i skapet
slassoehligke:slassoeh ligkelex ;
smagran adv ;
soejmetjelaakan:soejmetje laakanlex ;
striengkieslaakan:striengkies laakanlex ;
såvsoen:såvsoen adv ;
tjaebpieslaakan:tjaebpies laakanlex ;
tjaebpiesligke:tjaebpies ligkelex ;
tjaekedsligke:tjaekeds ligkelex ;
tjaekeresligke:tjaekeres ligkelex ;
tjarkemes:tjarkemes adv-sup ;
tjerkebe:tjerkebe adv-comp ;
tjiehpiesligke:tjiehpies ligkelex ;
tjimkeslaakan:tjimkes laakanlex ;
tjirkesligke:tjirkes ligkelex ;
tjïelkeslaakan:tjïelkes laakanlex ;
tjyöresth-tjelmiejgujmie adv ;
unnemes adv-sup ; 
uvtemes+Err/Orth:evtemes adv-sup ;
uvtemes+Err/Orth:åvtemes adv-sup ;
uvtemes:uvtemes adv-sup ; 
övtemes:övtemes adv-sup ; !  
övtemes+Err/Orth:öövtemes adv-sup ; !
vaenebe adv-comp ; 
varkemes:varkemes adv-sup ;
vearre-vearrebe:vearre-vearrebe adv-comp ; 
verkemes:verkemes adv-sup ;
vestiesligke:vesties ligkelex ;
viesjiehtåbpoe:viesjiehtåbpoe adv-comp ;
vietseleslaakan:vietseles laakanlex ;
vietselsligke:vietsels ligkelex ;
viht+Err/Orth:vith adv ;
aarebe+Err/Orth:aerebe adv-comp ; ! 
vijrie-vijriebasse:vijrie-vijriebasse adv-comp ;
vijriegommes adv-sup ; 
vijriegåbpoe adv-comp ; 
vijriehkommes:vijriehkommes adv-sup ; 
vijriehkåbpoe:vijriehkåbpoe adv-comp ;
vuarhkaslaakan:vuarhkas laakanlex ;
vueliebasse:vueliebasse adv-comp ; !XXX from dict, check!
vueliegommes:vueliegommes adv-sup ; 
væjkeleslaakan:væjkeles laakanlex ;
vælnjan:vælnjan adv ;! noun: vilnjie (jfr:stedsnavn vilnjiesvuemie),attr:vælnjoeh
vïssjelsligke+Err/Orth:vïssjels ligkelex ; !
åajvoehlaakan:åajvoeh laakanlex ;
åarjabasse:åarjabasse adv-comp ;
åerjiebasse:åerjiebasse adv-comp ;
åerjiegommes:åerjiegommes adv-sup ;
åpmoeh:åpmoeh adv ;
övtebe adv-comp ; 
oks-raejkien:oks-raejkien adv ; 
låabpan adv ; ! fra oehATTR_anADVERB
sæjngan adv ; ! fra oehATTR_anADVERB
krænhtjoen adv ; ! fra oehATTR_anADVERB
snjætjkoen adv ; ! fra oehATTR_anADVERB
måbpadisth  adv ;
itjmieslaakan:itjmies laakanlex ;
viesjieslaakan:viesjies laakanlex ;
